Louisiana, session 2026, HB73.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:14(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§14. Meetings of public bodies to be open to the public
* * *
C.(1) All votes made by members of a public body shall be viva voce and
shall be recorded in the minutes, journal, or other official, written proceedings of the
body, which shall be a public document.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, members of a public body may also vote
by electronic voting machine that publicly displays how each member votes.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be given prospective application only and
shall not apply to any litigation pending on the effective date of this Act.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-231 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 73